Utah statutes.
26-21b-201.   Emergency contraception services for a victim of sexual
assault.
(1)  A designated facility shall provide the following services to a victim of
sexual assault:
(a)  provide the victim with written and oral medical information regarding
emergency contraception that is unbiased, accurate, and generally accepted by
the medical community as being scientifically valid;
(b)  orally inform the victim of sexual assault that the victim may obtain
emergency contraception at the designated facility;
(c)  offer a complete regimen of emergency contraception to a victim of sexual
assault;
(d)  provide, at the designated facility, emergency contraception to the
victim of sexual assault upon her request;
(e)  maintain a protocol, prepared by a physician, for the administration of
emergency contraception at the designated facility to a victim of sexual
assault; and
(f)  develop and implement a written policy to ensure that a person is present
at the designated facility, or on-call, who:
(i)  has authority to dispense or prescribe emergency contraception,
independently, or under the protocol described in Subsection (1)(e), to a
victim of sexual assault; and
(ii)  is trained to comply with the requirements of this section.
(2)  A practitioner shall comply with Subsection (3) with regard to a person
who is a victim of sexual assault, if the person presents to receive medical
care, or receives medical care, from the practitioner at a location that is
not a designated facility.
(3)  A practitioner described in Subsection (2) shall:
(a)  provide the victim with written and oral medical information regarding
emergency contraception that is unbiased, accurate, and generally accepted by
the medical community as being scientifically valid; and
(b) (i) (A)  orally inform the victim of sexual assault that the victim may
obtain emergency contraception at the facility where the practitioner is
located; and
(B)  provide emergency contraception to the victim of sexual assault, if she
requests emergency contraception; or
(ii)  inform the victim of sexual assault of the nearest location where she
may obtain emergency contraception.
